Arkansas, session 2025, HB1644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends:
(1) To clarify the ability of a retired judge to serve as a
special judge immediately upon retirement, as provided by Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 80, § 13, and other law; and
(2) For this act to apply retroactively to January 1, 2025.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-10-902, concerning the compensation of a
retired judge appointed as a special judge, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(c) A retired judge may serve as a special judge immediately upon
leaving office.
*CEB161*
03/03/2025 1:16:54 PM CEB161

HB1644

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the number of requests for
special judges is currently higher than the number of retired judges
available to be appointed; that there is a need to clarify that a retired
judge may be appointed as a special judge immediately upon leaving office;
and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure the timely
administration of justice. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.




















03/03/2025 1:16:54 PM CEB161